[+]This camera fully met my expectations for an affordable, long zoom camera. Prior to purchasing this camera I had been using the camera on my cell phone. While my cell phone takes decent pictures, it does not have any optical zoom. I can digitally zoom a little bit with it but those pictures look blurry. I got this camera primarily for it's 28x optical zoom. This really gives you the ability to take pictures that just aren't possible with the cell phone. I can get more people in an indoor shoot because the lens is a wider angle than on my cell phone camera and with the 28x optical zoom it opens up a whole new world, especially for outdoor shoots. l also like that it uses regular AA batteries which are available just about everywhere. At a price of less than $200 it is an excellent value.
[+]I ordered this at Target online on Black Friday with free shipping and I am happy to say that I love it. I've only had it a couple of days, but I've been taking numerous types of pictures to try it out and I love it. I have searched and searched and searched for a camera that takes good pictures up close AND far away, for a decent price. I've went through many that were under $100 and they were crap. I paid right at $100 for this camera (before tax and warranty) and I think that is a steal for the quality of pictures that it takes. It's no professional camera, but when you go from an iPhone camera to this, it feels like you are a professional! I am 100% satisfied with the camera, the quality of pictures it takes, and how quickly the camera actually takes the pictures (there is no lag). Those were my main three concerns when purchasing this camera and I am very happy with my purchase.
[+]I bought this camera from my local store. I was not expected too much because price is cheap. Here are some of my pictures I took with this camera. I'm happy with it.
[+]Great camera for the price. Easy to use and produces quality pictures.
[+]Takes great pictures, easy to use all at a good price
[+]Love it great item has some great books too.I been waiting for a kindle this price and wi-fi so easy to hookup
[+]Functional. Love how lite it is. The problem is the touch screen. I had a Kindle Keyboard and loved it and used it to death. The touch screen is very sensitive. Also the fact that different areas of the screen do different things. This perhaps is just going to take some getting used to, but for now it is somewhat frustraiting. The battery is amazing. I have charged it twice. Once when I first got it and then three weeks later.
[+]It works great for what I need.
[+]I even like the box it comes in. I store my Kindle in it and carry it around in my backpack like a actual book.. It's convenient and protect my screen. For reading I just open the box and turn it on. Awesome. I really do love it.
[+]Like having your own library. Thanks!
[+]This is a great basic reader. It has no bells and whistles, it is not in color, and you can't play games or watch movies on it, which is just what I want. It is small and compact and I can take it with me almost anywhere. It is easy to set-up and easy to use. When you purchase Kindle books you can have them delivered right to it, which is great. It's no glare screen is so nice compared to my iPad which I had been using to read. I can read it at the beach, on the bus, in front of a bright window, really anywhere. There is no back-light, but a simple reading light can help with that. I highly recommend this reader to anyone who wants a good, basic reader.
[+]I'll start by saying I really love the Kindle e-ink display and wouldn't use any other computer screen or reader. I don't even miss the side buttons, though I did like those on the previous version. My overall complaint is that this model seems much cheaper. The last generation non-touch screen that I had was a joy to hold in my hand, it fit perfectly, and I think the back was rubberized for a better grip and to not slide around on stuff. It was just wonderful to hold. The back plastic on this model is VERY cheap and slick, and while I enjoy the Kindle experience overall, I don't get the joy out of holding this device like I did the previous model. That being said, this version is much easier to use for highlighting and making notes, which is a feature I like and use frequently.
[+]Satisfied. Cost affordable
[+]As described and works perfectly
[+]I just got this in the last week, but so far I'm in love with it. It's easy to read on, the letters are very crisp and its easy to turn pages. I don't have very large hands and it's the perfect size, kind of like an actual book, but thinner! I like that I can buy books straight from the kindle, and don't have to go and plug it into my laptop to sync. It fits easily in my purse or bag and seems pretty sturdy. I waited a really long time to get an e-reader because I just really like reading on paper better. I'm glad I waited because this version is really great. I still kind of get the feeling of reading on paper, and my eyes don't get tired like they do on my iPad or others. So far, it's been a great addition to my bookshelf!
[+]Bought this as a gift for my fiancee. It is worth so much more than what it costs. She absolutely loves it. I have a Kindle Fire HD, and I can not imagine my life without a Kindle. Thank you Amazon for making such great products that allow us to enjoy reading anytime, anywhere.
[+]I love my glare free kindle! It is perfect when traveling!
[+]Its good and for the price can complain!!!
[+]Lightweight and I can hold it and turn pages with one hand. Easy to take along in a purse or bag. The adjustable print is the best feature for me!
[+]I like the long battery life and all the reading features that are included with the product. A must have for a avid reader.
[+]Perfect- nothing wrong with it, but I am one of THOSE who had the old Paperwhite, and I like touching the side button to advance the pages. When I swipe to change pages with this version, sometimes it does not advance, causing me to swipe twice. Just a little annoying.
[+]Works well
[+]The little gadget works great. Know that it is not backlit....that is something I didnt realize when I ordered it.
[+]This version of the Kindle is truly glare free, and the touchscreen makes it very easy to maneuver through any book.While I still enjoy the tactile feeling of holding a traditional book, I admit that this device made reading on a plane, in bed late at night, and on the beach much easier. My only complaint was that it can't be read at night without a light- found this out on a late night flight when I was unable to sleep. However, I still would recommend this device - it's fairly lightweight and quite easy to use all of its features (font, dictionary, library, etc) with a simple touch."
[+]5 stars for sound and technology!
[+]Best product I have ordered from Amazon. It is amazing.
[+]Really good phone, it's hardware is awesome.Some of the points I would like to mention is:-1)It has a very good camera (I feel that the quality of colour is a bit less when compared to Xperia series (the one I use parallel with this phone) but still at this price you can't expect much that phone was thrice the price of this phone's price.2) Snapdragon 410 had overheating problem but I have noticed that may be they have solved this because this phone doesn't get over heated easily while running high end games.3) Good display.4) They need to improve the user interface, but it's not a big deal you can easily apply any theme using Go Launcher and you're done.I would strongly recommend anyone looking for a cheap secondary phone should give it a try.Thanks guys, enjoy shopping ....
[+]Delicious drink that isn't high in calories.It's hard to find a drink like this that tastes good but doesn't add calories to your diet, but this drink really nails it. I love the flavor and never really get tired of it. I love drinking pop because it is so convenient, but this is something that is just as convenient but doesn't add a lot of acid and sugar to my diet.It's kind of expensive, but when you're comparing that to pop intake it isn't a bad deal at all.
[+]These are so delicious! I love them and buy them about once every month to stock a mini fridge that I have. These are perfect for those nights that you have people over or if you are just chilling by yourself or with a special someone. Great taste and great size!
[+]Bought several cases for home. We liked the flavor so well we purchased more for when we travel. Loved that no high fruticose corn syrup is used. Taste is mild and well liked by whole family. Much better than original, which we had to add water to cut the sugar.
[+]I am a long distance runner and love this for electrolyte replacement. I mix it with water so I have an appropriate mix of water to electrolyte. It is too strong for me otherwise.... but I'm a light weight (110 lb) runner not a muscled up athlete.
[+]Was hesitant to try low calorie Gatorade as most "low calorie beverages" are just watered down versions that taste bad. Not the case here, I love the taste and have been drinking it ever since! Tried every flavor, they're all great.
[+]great price---delivery is great. my kid goes to Maine maritime academy and plays football and I send him this and he gets it and loves it......great energy drink....nice care package delivery for a great kid in college !
[+]Great price for the amount and it comes with a good variety. My husband has been taking them to work with him and it's saving us money since he doesn't have to stop and get one at the gas station every morning.
[+]ok. Excellent product.Excellent seller.
[+]No complaints. Did what it should.
[+]works great.
[+]Update 3/6/2012 I own about 20 Transcend cards now. They have all worked without an issue untill today. I dread calling any company for return support because it usually is such a tortured experience...(Ever tried calling SanDisk for product support?) Withing 20 seconds of dialing I was connected to their representative Marc Crawford. He was able to quickly and clearly guide me to the support I needed. It was such a shockingly great experience that I wanted to pass it along to potential purchasers.
[+]works good
[+]So much fun to play with! Still getting the gist of all the possibilities(IFTTT, Skills, Etc). Use it on most my living room items(TV, Bulbs, Outlets). Connecting with SmartThings and Philips Hub was easy! Be careful when choosing ur command words! Even put a R2D2 Skin on it!
[+]Only a few words describes how we feel ...LOVE IT!!!!!!...at least a dozen people have purchased one after experiencing ours
[+]As expected.
[+]Just hope you continue to develop Echo's capability!
[+]Alexa will not answer certain questions. Her library needs to be expanded to Siri level minimum. I love the music but again it's limited. I'm willing to grow with her.
[+]Got this for a birthday gift for someone! They love it! Makes a good family gift to. Even the kids can learn from this echo. They asked it question it it gives them good answer! This can make a really good learning experience for anyone! If you're not near a clock to see the time ask Alexa she always knows the time. She even good about keeping a shopping list to! Great investment for a family gift! Oh yeah place music for you too! Just loving this echoe!
[+]Cool device works great.get the news and weather in the morning tailored to my needs ausome!!! Thanks
[+]A very friendly toy.
[+]is excellent produc, very fast
[+]lil slow but good price
[+]Just got these And love them. The color said black and red but they are black and coral like the picture, which is what I was hoping for. Super comfy!!!
[+]I LOVE these shoes . I wanted a good deal on some Nikes and these are the BEST. I was a 7 in my old Nikes so I ordered a seven and they fit perfectly! I'm obsessed. I want to wear them everyday, I wear them to work where I'm on my feet all day and I can wear them to the gym!(:
[+]I work at a nursing home and i'm on the feet all day. With my last pair of shoes, my feel hurt so bad the next morning to walk. With these, my feet don't hurt at all! I love them! Would re-purchase(:
[+]I was looking for a simple workout shoe and these seemed to fit the bill. They seem a bit stiff as of now since they are brand new, but I don't foresee any issues. Also keep in mind that they don't provide that much support so you might find your feet sore if you use them for excessive running or jogging.
[+]I love this shoes. I always wear this whenever I jog. Fits my feet well.
[+]Fits awesome; probably the best sneaker ive ever had!
[+]These Nike Women Shoes are an excellent shoe. Very Comfortable. And I would recommend them to any walker/runner out there.
[+]The shoe is great, really like it. Had a pair of Nike Flex's that I loved and were just worn out and needed to be replaced.My only complaint is that I was sent the wrong shoe color. I decided not to go through the hassle of returning them because where I go walking my shoes tend to get pretty dirty so I don't care that much about appearance. I just need them on my feet. But that being said, I was super disappointed I got sent the wrong shoes! The size was right and the box was labeled correctly for what was inside of the box. Someone just wasn't paying attention.Seller, please take note! Someone may not be as easy to please as I am. These shoes aren't cheap and if someone is willing to purchase them they should get what they order!
[+]I've always been a New Balance girl, but now I've converted. This shoe is lightweight, and had an amazing amount of stability. I used all different cardio machines, running, and cross-training. From day one, it's been the best perfoming and comfortable shoe I've ever tried. I work out almost daily, and I can't wait to put them on. I'll never go back!
[+]They look amazing, I get tons of compliments. However, when I first got them they were very uncomfortable... they're narrow, which is strange because I don't have wide feet by any means. After wearing them for a week or so they did seem to break-in a bit and now they are comfortable enough for working out, or just wearing throughout the day. They're not the most comfortable shoes I have though, which sucks because I'm pretty sure they're the most expensive shoes I've ever bought.
[+]So comfortable. My family has the problem with a high arch and wide foot and these were very comfortable and have lasted a long time.
[+]Absolutely love these shoes! Will be buying more! I do crossfit and these shoes are great for any type of workout!
[+]As usual with Nike shoes, I ordered a half size larger than my normal size, and they fit perfectly. Love the light weight, the comfort, the simple look, and great adult colors.
[+]I wear when I jog. It is comfortable to wear and fits nicely.
[+]I love the light weight and flexibility of this shoe. Very glad I bought this model.
[+]Good shoe. I prefer it for walking, but mostly because I prefer a wider shoe for running. It provides good support and fits well. The colors are very cute, too!
[+]This is very comfortable I can run all day using this shoes i love it!.
[+]I wasn't sure at first but after wearing these shoes a couple of times, they're really comfortable!
[+]Comfy new running shoes, no issues
[+]Love them, even breaking them in rocked. Super comfy & easy to fit into
[+]LOVE these shoes. The color (green/neon) makes me so happy and excited to work out."
[+]is everything I expected it is very useful
[+]This laptop is good for the price.It comes with the latest intel skylake core i7 6700hq quad core processor, which is powerful and will do multitasking with ease.It comes with 8gb of DDR3L memory which is expandable up to 16gb of DDR3L memory, which gives you room for more memory in the future if you need it.The gpu is an Intel HD graphics 530, it's a pretty good everyday gpu that can handle your typical task with ease. It's very good with video decoding since it uses quick sync technology built in.The hard drives is a 1TB 5400rpm hard drive that will give you a lot of storage for files, music phots etc..The battery life is a 4 cell battery which gives you about 4 hours of normal web surfing.It comes with the latest wireless protocol WIFI 802.11ac which will give you further range of connectivity then ever before.There are 2, USB 3.0 ports for fast file transfers from a USB 3.0 portable device.There is a built in media card reader that will support multiple memory formats.There is an HDMI 1.4 port for 1080p connection to a TV
[+]So far so good. Everything runs smooth. From what I have shopped for most laptops with these specs are $900+ got this for around $680 which was a great buy. I'm writing this review with this laptop currently. Windows 10 is nice and better than windows 8.1 by far. The screen seems to have great resolution. Only thing is that sometimes when I set the laptop down on the couch the disk tray pops open because it presses the button. The Audio is great. I bought this laptop for School. I'm a business student and runs great with Microsoft Office.(I installed office myself it isn't included, luckily the students at my school get the software for free) It looks Sharp. It's silver you can't really tell from the Photos. It looks gray from the pictures but it is silver and has a nice shiny HP logo on the back.
[+]The Hardware has potential.. However Windows 10, plus HP software is awful. It took me a lot of time to bring this laptop to normal working conditions.
[+]It is very convenient for use. I am a Chinese customer, I found the HP have set apps for many kinds of language, and very easy to set by user also. Even though there is a slight noise in my computer's radiator, I would like also to give it 5 stars.
[+]This is a great laptop! I have plenty of storage and runs very smoothly. The price was great too! I have been using it for almost a month and am used to the windows 10. Overall very happy with my purchase!
[+]Have had this laptop for 2 weeks and so far i LOVE it.The performance greatly exceeded my expectations. the new intel skylake processor is a beast. The screen is bright with a glossy finish and the touch screen is very responsive. compared to my previous laptop which was an asus with intel braswell i7 processor its pretty heavy but that's not necessarily a bad thing for me because i am not very mobile with it.The keyboard is satisfying but i am not a fan of the track pad. i like the design its not too flashy.The exterior is silver and the keys are black(they ARE NOT backlit).The audio is loud much louder than my previous laptop mentioned. the audio brand is "B&O" i am not familiar with them but so far am happy with the quality of the speakers.I mainly use this computer for browsing the internet and light gameing and for not haveing a dedicated graphics card its far exceeded my expectations for gameing now ur now gonna be able to run Fallout 4 or the witcher 3 and get a respectable frame rate but i have been able to run warframe on medium settings and games like supreme commander on high and it hasnt had any problems, keep in mind i have only had this computer for roughly 2 weeks but i rarely here the fans come on maybe after a couple hours of gameing ill here the fans spin up but just for a few moments then back to silent. Another main reason i really liked this computer was it didn't come loaded with any bloatware and windows 10 was already installed.
[+]Let me just say, what a PITA to get Windows 7 installed on this. And before I get flamed for downgrading the OS, we needed new laptops at my office and our software doesn't support higher than Windows 7 at the moment so I had no choice. HP's site doesn't list any 7 drivers so I had to try other methods. Thankfully this thing has a DVD drive in it or I'd have been screwed because upon startup there's no USB drivers so flash drives, mice etc wouldn't work. I knew it was a intel based system and searched for the intel driver revision numbers only for Windows 7 and was able to find a suitable WiFi driver which I burned to a CD and installed successfully. After I installed that I downloaded and ran Snappy Driver Installer which automatically found every other driver I needed to make this work flawlessly. Thanks for nothing on that end HP! Other than that, I paired this with a 120GB SSD and it's wicked fast.
[+]wow the best Hp i ever bought i did buy HP Pavilion dv 6 in the past was very good but it over heats when in use too long that's why i bought this one Hp pavilion 6th gen flagship very good super fast touch screen nice and this one does't over heat long battery life just fantastic love it great product low low price no tax on this one was $1400 i got it for less then $640 i waited till it dropped its good thing to wait i glad i did thank you great product great price on time delivery.
[+]I'm not a big laptop person. We use it to surf the internet and maybe do a couple of word documents. It has been about 3 years since we bought a laptop so we decided to invest in this HP. Let me tell you, it is lighting quick compared to my other one (which I am sure has been bogged down over the years). The B and O speakers are to die for, and its just a really good looking laptop. We saw this exact same laptop at other retailers for way more than it is on here. I think this laptop will definitely last us years.
[+]Fits what I bought it for. I was looking for a good basic laptop for University and study and wanted one that wouldn't become obsolete as quickly as some others. I thought the touchscreen would be a bit annoying at first, but it's great. It allows for easy maneuvering without a mouse and provides more precise scrolling. I've used a Chromebook for the last 3+ years and I had forgotten what switching back to a full laptop could provide for potential usage.
[+]lightening fast pc, excellent resolution, camera, sound, etc. only hp laptop I've ever owned with an excellent touch pad. comparable to a $900 laptop. Excellent price. great job, hp!
[+]All those people who don't think the pavilion comes with the 6700 hq if you type in the product number on hp support is shows the specs and clearly states it has the 6700hq
[+]Awesome. College student, very happy with my purchase. Touchpad seems a little flimsy, but otherwise is a sturdy and well built machine. Get it while the price lasts!
[+]I was able to get the iPhone 6S early through my connections at Apple. It's nice!Pros:3D Touch is fun and useful Terrific camera Great performance Cons:Not Apple's most beautiful design Battery life could be better Will take developers time to support 3D Touch 16GB of storage in the base model is ridiculous Bottom line is if you have an iPhone 6 or 6 Plus and you’re not ready to sign up for a yearly phone upgrade program, you might not feel the usual pull to get a new iPhone unless you really want a better front-facing camera. The speed improvements are incremental, the battery life is about the same, and it'll take a while for developers to really make use of 3D Touch. And by the time that happens, it will probably be time to buy an iPhone 7."
[+]its a good phone all i use is iphones good quality battery life is good its last me about a day for me i can do a lot of things i cant do with another phone the screens dont breack that easy like another phone the volume is loud the headphones are good charger is good service is exellent downloading apps is easy and quick the graphacs are exellents"
[+]Actually it came as I expected and I'm really enjoying it.
[+]For those of you who are traditionally iPhone fans like myself, you'll love the larger design of the 6s. But! The most amazing thing that I've found was how clear and vivid the images and videos are. Also, the auto-stabilization of the video camera when playing back video is absolutely amazing and the outcome looks so professional.This phone is fast! It is responsive, and the scroll and swipe is so fluid it makes other iPhones seem sluggish and slow. This is the fastest, toughest iPhone made to date as well. Not only does it have a better, more durable screen, but it also has a much tougher enclosure which will not scuff or dent like the previous models. If you were on the fence about this phone, I hope I was able to help you make a decision... get the warranty to be on the safe side!Also, I'm with Sprint. Sprint customers who get the 6s, are automatically enrolled in iPhone Forever, which means that when the iPhone 7, 8, 9... comes out, we get them immediately, for free; all we have to do is go to the Sprint Store, hand them our iPhone and they hand us the newest release right then and there! With a phone this expensive and in demand, iPhone Forever is a no brainer!
[+]I am not going to talk about the iPhone 6S per se because everyone knows is the best smartphone out there. I just want to assure anyone how is buying this iPhone that it comes COMPLETELY UNLOCKED that it works perfectly in basically any part of the world (I use mine in COSTA RICA) and that all you need to do is remove the Verizon sim card and place your sim card at that's all. PLEASE BE ADVISED: This international unlocked model comes WITHOUT the Sim Card Removal Tool so don't think that because of this it's a counterfeit phone. You can find this tool anywhere so no problem in that matter. This iPhone model is the A1688 one and it's called the GLOBAL one because is the model that it's most widely use in the world.
[+]Awesome Phone.Easy to get addicted to this device, so keep in mind that people is more important than any electronics, and talk directly by phone call is more important than a text message.This can get you in troubles in a meetings, in front of your boss. There are so many features that can reduce your productive time. Make a balance to really be more productive. Don't waste your valuable time on this device.The phone works great, 3d is big improvement the quick short cut to navigate are a plus.buy it!!!You are free with a unlocked phone."
[+]The phone is working perfectly in Trinidad and Tobago. This iPhone 6s is a great phone but still cannot do a lot of things the Samsung Galaxy S6 can.
[+]First, Where else can you get a high quality phone/tablet/desktop/laptop where the hardware and operating system are made and properly maintained by the same company? Exactally. I upgraded from the IPhone 5s to the 6s and I am truly amazed at how great this sharp looking, super fast, phone is. The camera is a real upgrade in quality from the iPhone 5, the new processor makes all my tasks so much faster, the design is very sharp and clean looking, and the finger print sensor which I wasn't initially sold on is now the main way I securely unlock my device. Wonderful device, great quality, great company. Will defiantly but from again.
[+]So happy to deal with you, the iphone 6s 64 GB came as described, New and sealed.
[+]I'm really happy with the 6s. Even though there is nothing ground breaking in the phone itself I like the larger screen size in comparison to the 5s as well as the added RAM that greatly speeds up the productivity of running apps. My suggestion to anyone thinking about this phone is to purchased it unlocked and then sign up with one of the cheaper carriers like straight talk or metro pcs. I pay 40 bucks a month now with no contract. Big savings.
[+]Extremely comfortable, soft, and this tissue lasts quite long. I have compared to Cottonelle, Angel Soft and White Cloud, among others. This tissue lasts the longest and I find it to be really soft. now for using this TP in RVs. some people say you can. I tested it by taking a few squares of paper and placing them in a jar of water, and shook it up for a bit the paper did not break up very well, I wont use it in my RV. now for using it at home I'm happy with it and will buy again.
[+]Great Price & you don't have to go to the store to get it! I'm in love with purchasing on Amazon for sure. No crowds, browse at any time you wish, and low prices!
[+]Loved this product
[+]AS DESCRIBED
[+]I love the classic 60's style of this simple watch. The leather is a bit darker than what it shows in the picture, which is what I was hoping for. The hands & hour markers glow in the dark. The date adjustment has the days of the week in English & Spanish, which is a nice touch... I'll definately have to switch it to Spanish next time I'm in Mexico on the beach.
[+]Love the natural color band. Casual yet makes a statement on my arm. I have gotten numerous compliment s is just a few days.
[+]Delivery time was very fast. This butter works very well and I am quite impressed.  You just peel off a little bit about a penny size and rub the item on your skin.  It eventually melts and moisturizes the dry skin.  I have been using it on the bottom of my dry cracking feet and after a few days, my feet is becoming smoother.  It doesn't have that greasy feel either and it melts into your skin very well.  Also this item will definitely last for awhile as you only need to use a little bit at a time.  Thanks.
[+]This is 100% pure Shea Butter. Do not mistake this with other &#34;Shea butter&#34; products that may contain only a little Shea but lots of other ingredients including chemicals and other stuff you might not want.This is the 'real stuff&#34;.Good news is this block will last you a long time.  Bad news is that even tho it's called &#34;butter' you can't eat it!Guys- try it for shaving, instead of shaving cream.
[+]Beautiful color! The pink is vibrant and fun, the glitter is of various sizes which gives it a unique look. Use two layers if you like your glitter to be more dense. The gel dries very thick and strong which I like because it helps my natural nails grow out.
[+]Very nice product. I just got into doing 3D nail design and this is amazing. The base is great, provides a smooth and even surface for polish while the top cost works nicely in sealing in my nail crystals. I had used other gel products before and some are too think and inconsistent, but this set is just perfect. My nails stayed sturdy and fresh looking for over 3 weeks.
[+]Great value! I've tried other gel polish in the past and the consistency of the gel is always off, either too thin or too thick and dries too fast creating hard edges around my nails, but I think this set is perfect. I usually get my nails done at nail salons, but this is salon quality and it's also easy to remove. No more expensive gel manicures for me!
[+]Very ergonomic design. It helps to use this product when I have wrist problems. The cord also does not get in the way when using since it swivels. I like the screen that tells the time and temperature. The curls are very nice when it comes out as well.
[+]The curler hit all of my expectations. I especially love the rotary function. This lets the user choose the direction that the motor spins my hair. This is especially important for styling my hair. I always wear my curls differently and this product allows me to do so. Actually, it wasn't until I got this curler that I started experimenting with curling styles; mean curls vs cute curls vs lazy curls. Well every day since I got this thing, I have had a different style of hair to match how I felt that day.
[+]Gentle waves are beautiful, but getting them at home takes too much time and effort! Thanks to the Miraqueen, it&#8217;s now easier than ever before to create loose, natural curls more-simply at home. The curler's unique heating barrel safely pulls hair in and curls it with ease. This is great for loose, natural waves, or hard curls and is made simple!
[+]I always had trouble using curling irons since I keep accidentally burning myself. I once got such a terrible burn that took 3 months to heal on my scalp. I gave up on using curling irons, and also curling in general until I found this tool. It revived my hopes of curling hair. I can now curl my hair without being scared of getting burnt. I can have the curls I've longed for now!
[+]There are so many pros to this curler that anyone should really consider getting it!My favorite part about using this curler is watching my hair go in and out. It never ceases to amuse me. I sometimes get sad and wish I had more hair because I want to keep curling it. I sometimes iron my hair straight out just to recurl my hair again because it really is that fun to use.
[+]Other curlers burn hair like crazy. NOT THIS BABY! I set it on the highest settings and no burn, no bad smell. Just these awesome nice curls everyone expects to have. This product is really worth the money and to skimp out and buy something else is....and should be morally wrong. Other curlers give you a bad burn. I love using this so much!
[+]I used this to curl my niece&#8217;s hair a few weeks ago for a wedding. This kid is MAJORLY hyper and can't sit still for more than a few minutes at a time. This worked fast enough that she didn't have time to get too bored. All I had to do was give her a little snack to bribe her! :) The machine didn't get hot, which is great for a wiggly little kid. She kept telling me she was just like a princess! So cute! The curls stayed nice even when we put her dress on. They stayed nice when she kept playing with them and when she was running around with other kids at the reception. Everyone, including my sister in law was asking me how I got her hair to look so wonderful! I got so many compliments! I would recommend this to anyone with kids. Also works really well on me and a decent price.
[+]People are greedy and want to collect everything that they can to make them selves beautiful. My one friend has every single hair curling, straightening, waving product out there. I don't get why she has so many products when she barely uses them all. I sadly don't truly have my own curler so I tend to borrow from her, but when I saw how versatile this automatic curler is, I thought to myself. I can finally have a product that's all the styles in one! I got it, used it, and love it. All I need.
[+]It works really well, and I believe that it should be used more by many others. It's design really targets those who want to save time and have hair like a goddess. Works pretty well with my thin hair, and tried it on my hubby for fun, and works on his thick long hair too. My recommendation is that you should find the right time and temperature for yourself. Testing out the settings isn't too bad.
[+]My hair has been thanking me ever since I purchased this curling iron. It is not as harsh on my hair as my old curling iron was. With my old curling iron, there would be a potent stench of burning hair and hair product. With this new curling iron, the smell is not potent. Actually, I don't really notice it compared to my last curling iron. The reason is that I can adjust this curling iron's temperature meaning I do not have to deal with the curling iron getting too hot. This is great news for everyone!!
[+]I am now a hugeee fan of miraqueen. This curler is one of a kind. I have very straight hair, that used to never curl and have always wanted loose wavy curls. This is the one product that helped me achieve those results. No other curling iron has made me this satisfied.
[+]When it said professional, they ment it. I kept being bugged by everyone; my coworkers, family, friends, strangers, on where I got my hair done. I would just laugh and said that I did it with an automatic curler. They would then ask me where they could get one, and I referred them to amazon. Truly a professional curler.
[+]My experience was that of picking up a new pair of glasses; I am picking up something that will compliment my looks. Now I am able to walk out the door every morning feeling refreshed and happy. I just love this curler because it is so easy to handle and it is just so fast. Even if I use the maximum amount of time, 12 seconds, it still only takes me a few minutes for me to do my hair. In fact I am even able to change my hairstyle every day. Because it is so easy to use, I am able to experiment with my hair. I have even changed my hair color to compliment my hair. Now, I'm curling only my dyed parts and leaving my natural hair straight. I think it is just so fun playing around with this curler and my girlfriends also agree. They have even tried it themselves. This curler is just so fun.
[+]My boyfriend's family invited me to go to a famous oyster place to grab some fresh oysters and picnic at the beach this past weekend. I wanted to look nice for the family outing and I had just got the curling device last Friday so I figured I should use it. I curled my hair and wow, it works really fast and is super easy to use. So, after less than about 15mins I had a full set of curls. I waited for my boyfriend's family to come pick us up and his mother really adored me with the curls. She asked me if I curled my hair often, and I told her that I will curl my hair more now since I have an automatic curler! And that I didn't used to curl my hair much before. Even my boyfriend can't stop telling me how cute I looked and kept playing with my curls. I would playfully swat him away since I was afraid he'd mess them up but they just sprung back to it's original shape.
[+]Beautiful gold polish! The color is beautiful, truly golden and glittery. It lasted for over three weeks until my nails is grown out without chipping.
[+]Worth every penny! All I can say is that my nails went without chipping or breaking in over 3 weeks. The base and top coat are amazing, it's great for those who wants to grow out their natural nails. The french pink and white are natural looking. I love it. I would never go back to fake looking acrylic nails.
[+]Beautiful, fast shipping.
[+]I stared using this wash last fall as I always anticipate dry sky through out the winter. Well...none here. My skin retained all its moisture and my legs never dry out, even from shaving. This summer it has helped with skin burn...my skin just retains its moisture. I have thrown away all my soaps...
[+]This ECOCRAFTWORLD bag is so sturdy and is great for taking away on planes on holiday.  It has many compartments and its leather is absolutely gorgeous.  It has so much space in it - do not hesitate to buy this!
[+]I live in a hot dry climate and didn't find the amount of shea butter put in commercial lotions to be enough for my needs. I decided to buy chemical-free unrefined raw shea butter to combat dry skin in the summer.It comes wrapped in a 'Saran' type plastic wrap that was a bit messy to deal with. I scraped it off the plastic wrap with a spatula and put it in jars. I then scoop out what I need for each application with a small spatula, keeping the shea butter clean from dipping with fingers and making it easier to get just the right amount out of the jar.It is VERY thick and I find by adding a few drops of Jojoba oil to a bit of shea butter in my palm, rubbing my palms together to warm the shea butter and mix the shea with the oil, creates the perfect cream for keeping soft throughout the dry summer.
[+]This 100% Organic Raw Unrefined African Shea Butter Grade A arrived quickly and it was a little soft from heat outside...I followed the instructions and placed the 1 lb brick in the refrigerator for 30-60 mins...After an hour I took it out and the brick was solid again..For regular use all you need to do is cut a little dime size from the brick and apply it anywhere you want..It has a light nutty scent...It is very moisturizing and soothing for my sunburn were other products such as aloe vera gel OTC comes with other ingredients such as, fragrances and  lidocaine..Pure, organic Shea butter is all natural Vitamin A & E cream..Shea butter has been shown to be to be a superb moisturizer with exceptional healing properties for the skin..It has been used for healthy skin, dry skin, sunburns, for  wrinkles use 4-6 weeks, eczema,  insect bites and itching relieved immediately, dermatitis, stretch mark prevention during pregnancy, shaving cream for silky smooth skin, skin allergies such as poison ivy or poison oak....Just so much more....This is the best Shea butter I have used yet :)Shea Butter comes from the oil reach seed of the African Shea Tree.  *****The FDA classifies it as a tree nut so  you can be allergic to Shea butter******Sample provided for review and honest opinion...'
[+]'I have very dry elbows and knees.  I have a torn tendon in my left foot, and find it more comfortable to kneel than squat, especially when working in the garden, etc.  Because of this, my knees are taking a beating. Getting calloused, peeling skin - a real mess.  I've tried a lot of different moisturizers with varying success.  The thicker, the better. So when I was offered this to try out, I jumped at it.This is Grade A, unrefined. That means it's only been processed with water. No chemicals. This also means that all the vitamins and fats are still present.  Grade A is considered the best for skin care.Shea butter melts at skin temperature - slowly.  I can generate a nice amount of heat rubbing my hands together (my GF loves that foe her shoulders!). So I get some heat going, scoop out a dime sized portion, place it on my palms, and rub some more.  Melts almost instantly, leaving a nice, thick ointment. I then apply this to my knees and elbows - my trouble spots.  Obviously my hands also get a great treatment.There was a noticeable immediate improvement.  Within a couple of days - applied twice per day - the callouses on my knees are invisible and the skin has stopped peeling.  My elbows no longer feel like coarse sandpaper. My hands are smoother than most women I know! Since I work with my hands a lot, this is pretty impressive.I'm not sure how long this brick will last, but I'm guessing three or four months!  Definitely worth trying this out, especially for those trouble spots.
[+]I am absolutely loving this organic shea butter.  I love that it's all natural and organic. This is the first time I ever used raw shea butter and it far exceeded my expectations. It is smooth and creamy. It just melts in your hands. I just take a pinch of butter and rub it on my palms and apply directly on my face. I also tried applying shea butter directly in my cracked feet. In couple of uses, I can see  great difference in my feet. It makes your skin feel and look incredible. It has a fantastic mild natural smell. I will purchase again. I am very pleased.
[+]I love that it is unrefined and organic and contains no chemical or toxic substances. Without these additives, I can use it on sunburn, bites, etc. Since it is not infused with water for fast evaporation, it takes a bit longer to be absorbed. It leaves the skin softer and showing a slight sheen. I experienced an earthy scent which goes away quickly. I use it for insect bites, dry skin, sunburn, shaving cream, and I am told by friends that it works on poison ivy or oak. I highly recommend this natural lotion to treat or help prevent skin problems. It has melted beautifully in my hand and goes on smooth as I apply it. I will keep in my fridge for long lasting.
[+]When I agreed to accept a review sample I knew very little about this other than it may help my dry skin. That it does. After just two uses I have noticed a big difference, especially on the back of my hands, which seem to dry more than other exposed places on my body - even in the humid Central Florida summers.The fragrance is interesting. It actually has the aroma of a food, which was a relief since I did not want to come across as feminine. At sixty five that would surely be a change in life!Frankly, for me it did take some work to rub in. On my skin it took about five minutes before my skin absorbed it, then it left a slightly oily sheen. It took hours before it was completely absorbed, but my skin was noticeably softer after two applications twelve hours apart.Although I was a little skeptical about this when I agreed to review it I am sold on it now. It truly works and I am going to use it only sparingly the remainder of the summer, saving it for the winter months when it gets very dry in my region and this will prove a lot more useful.The reason why I awarded this five stars after only two uses is the immediate results I observed. This stuff is no hype. Plus it just feels good!
[+]The skin is the body's largest organ and it absorbs much of what is applied to it -- often products that contain toxins and chemicals. Rather than continue using big name commercial personal care products I have started reading labels and where possible, replacing chemical-laden lotions and soaps with less toxic substitutes.Shea butter is a natural product, It is difficult to get more basic than unfiltered organic Shea butter. Karite Tree nuts, found only in Africa, are used to produce Shea Butter. The nuts are boiled and the oil is released. Then the oil is scooped-off and as it cools, it separates into Shea Butter and Shea Oil.As soon as the package arrived I rubbed a dime sized amount between my hands and applied the warmed oil to my hands, elbows and heels. After about ten minutes most of it was absorbed and I was left with a slight sheen and soft skin. The fragrance is earthy - slightly smoky - and is light and appropriate for men or women. The scent dissipates quickly and becomes unnoticeable.Shea Butter is not infused with quick to evaporate water like many commercial lotions and creams, so it takes a while to penetrate the skin. I find it best to use Shea Butter after a bath or shower - it seems to sink in a bit faster. But, whenever it is used, allow a little extra time for it to be absorbed.Like many natural products, an added benefit is they have a number of different uses. Hand cream, massage cream, body butter, lip balm, foot cream, hair dressing, additive to handmade soaps and lotions, etc. A favorite use is in the harsh winter it serves as an ultra-rich cream to prevent small painful cuticle splits caused by the dry cold air.The butter should be kept in a cool, dark place. I keep mine in the refrigerator because I use small amounts at a time and expect it to last well over a year. Also, I always use an clean implement, like a plastic knife or spoon, when removing a portion of Shea Butter to prevent any oils on my hands from possibly contaminating the brick. Since the product is so pure, it contains no preservatives so it seems worth the extra step. The extra care in handling should help prolong its impressive shelf-life.There is so much to like -- the simplicity, the lack of chemicals - and that this particular brand focuses on the quality and quantity of the Shea Butter -- not fancy packaging. An affordable and smart indulgence. Shea butter provided by Beauty by Shea without obligation.
[+]In exchange for a honest review of this product, I was given a free sample.  I love it!  I normally use coconut oil on arms and legs, but find that it leaves a slightly oily feeling and will temporarily stain shorts, etc.  The shea butter soaks in better, leaves no residue and leaves my skin super soft!  I highly recomennd African Shea Butter as a terrific moisturizer at a very reasonable price.
[+]I was asked to provide my honest feedback in exchange for this item.I enjoy this shea butter just as it is ( not making it into creams etc) But if I were to make it into lotions, etc it'd be a great base! Thanks!maria
[+]This shea butter is completely raw and unrefined, so it retains all of the delightful nutty fragrance, subtle yellow color, and natural texture of pure organic shea butter.  It is a natural luxury, quite different from the homogenized, over-processed commercial products that contain only a small percentage of chemically-refined shea oil.Shea nuts are from a unique species of tree that lives over two hundred years, Vitellaria paradoxa.  The nuts contain a rich complex of five different fatty acids that are good for the skin:  palmitic, stearic, oleic, linoleic, and arachidic.  This particular shea butter is imported from Ghana, where women gather the nuts from wild trees, shell and roast them, and extract the oils by hand.  It smells delicious, and it is indeed used as a food in Africa, as well as a source of income.It is solid&mdash;but not hard&mdash;at room temperature, and liquefies at body temperature, so it is easy to apply.  It is quickly absorbed by the skin and not only improves the texture of dry skin, but makes it look better, too.  I like to apply it after bathing.Beauty by Shea provided a sample for evaluation and review.
[+]I have used this product for a couple days now and so far it's very good!. I have very ashy elbows and crusty feet. Sorry to gross some folks out but since using it, I have seen great improvements and I will recommend this product for anyone with these kind of problems along with stretch marks and other related skin issues.
[+]Renders my skin smooth and silky after a week of use. What can I say? I'm pretty impressed by the quality of this natural lotion!
[+]In exchange for my honest review I was given a sample of this product to evaluate.  Prior to receiving it I had never used shea butter.  I&#8217;ve been using organic coconut oil as body lotion so the shea butter appealed to me.  You apply it in a similar way--put a bit in your hand, let it melt with your body heat as you rub it in, and ohhh...let it work it&#8217;s magic.  It turns rough heels, knees, elbows, and knuckles into soft skin in just one application.  A little goes a long way.  A marble-sized amount was plenty for both of my feet.  Oils make my skin shiny whereas this butter gives my skin a nice matte glow.  Great for showing off legs in summer shorts and skirts!
[+]As a past customer I was able to try this product for my feedback and boy am I happy! I typically just buy a lotion on sale and forget to use it or stop because it doesn't do much. With this stuff though it's a life saver at my job. I'm a janitor and we basically use harsh chemicals all year. Stripper for the floors and graffiti remover being the worst. If it gets on your skin and it always does it dries your skin out and it stays that way. I usually have raw nails and cracked skin on my hands by the end of the summer or any busy cleaning period. I'll use a moisturizer and ten minutes later my hands are painfully dry again! With this stuff though I've lucked out. I mainly use it after the shower and before bed on my feet, hands, elbows, and as needed like my neck to help with shaving. My feet are actually in sandals shape for once. No nasty peeling dry skin or that feeling of your sheets catching on your dead prickly skin! Plus my toe nails look way cleaner since there isn't as much dead skin build up in the corners. My hands aren't cracking at all for once too and no painful hanging skin on the sides of my nails. Overall this stuff works (smells nice too if you ask me) and I find it best to use before bed for the best results. Or some on your hands and then wearing gloves works great too! I'm not worried about snow season and all the salt with this stuff now.
[+]I just started using this shea butter and find it very useful for stings and sunburns as well as minor cuts. Spending 2 weeks outdoors camping, this product came in handy often.  I have also put it on my nails at night and noticed a difference within a few days.  My nails are starting to get stronger. A small amount does go a LONG way.  This batch will last for a long time.
[+]This unrefined Shea butter is so far the best I have used so far. This butter flows well right of the package, and allows you to apply easily on your face. I have used this butter on my face as well as all over my arms and legs, and found it to be effective in keeping my skin soft ... Love it !!  Will buy again after this order runs out as it is also so we'll priced!
[+]Just a little dab of this shea butter should be all you need.  Scrape off a small piece the size of a fingernail (I'm a guy, so my nails aren't very big).  Then roll this around in your hands to warm it up and soften it up.  Then rub it on the dry areas of your skin.  Since it creates a kind of waxy barrier, it's a good idea to do this right after stepping out of the shower to hold in the moisture of your already wet skin.My wife put too much of this on at first.  My kids and I laughed and had a good time trying to rub it off onto our own arms and dry skin.  I guess you had to be there.Anyway, the quality and fragrance of this product are very good.  An entire pound of shea butter will probably last you a long time, so it seems like a good value to me.I received this item for review.
[+]Shea butter is an off- white or ivory-colored fat extracted from the nut of the African shea tree. It can be used for moisturizing or even cooking, but I didn't dare do that.I hadn't used moisturizer on my skin for almost my entire life. However, my wife will comment when my skin is scratchy. So, I started to moisturizer a few years ago, but I generally dislike the feeling. The She butter is all natural, doesn't feel oily, and you don't need very much of it. This is a nice alternative to other methods.
[+]I ordered Shea butter, because my fingers were really dry and I heard Shea butter was very moisturizing. I have used other items that contain Shea butter, but I really wanted this item in particular, because it was 100% Shea butter. I have never tried anything organic, but the price was right on this item so I went ahead and got it. It comes in a really cute package and the block of Shea butter is inside of a plastic ziplock bag. Make sure not to put it in a warm or hot environment, because it melts easily. I like to grab a chunk of the butter with my fingers and rub it on my hands so that it can melt and then I can  apply it to the rest of my skin. I like to apply it to my thighs and stomach to prevent from getting any more stretch marks and from what I heave heard is that it helps reduce the appearance of existing stretch marks, so I am excited to see results in a few weeks. When I first got this item, I was a little hesitant about the smell. The smell is very earthy and natural, but it doesn't bother me anymore. I just love how smooth and moisturized my skin feels even hours after I have applied the Shea butter on my skin. I will definitely buy more of this Organic African Shea Butter in the future. I would recommend this item specifically to someone who is pregnant and trying to avoid getting any stretch marks!!!
[+]Holy smokes I learn a lot from some of these products.  I was offered a sample of this for review.  I've used Shea butter products before -- L'occitane uses Shea in a lot of their ridiculously expensive products and I always buy that stuff.  All kinds of products list Shea butter as a selling feature.  So I was on board with trying it out raw.  It appealed to my inner hippie, just the sound of it.I am also a weirdo who reads all about anything I put on my skin. No Parabens, phthalates or other crap, but Shea has always been a good one so I didn't think much about checking it out.  This time I did because pure Shea butter is new to me.  I've used pure cocoa butter and this has a similar texture, but not quite as rock hard at room temperature...I mean the Shea is softer than the cocoa butter.  Wow!  Vitamins A and E, collagen stimulation, anti-aging (from the collagen, cell turnover fm the A and anti-inflammatory anti-oxidant E). This stuff is ridiculously healing.  Studies show that it reduces wrinkles, sun damage, excema, nasty old cracked heels (no study said that, that's personal experience)Here's the rub with Shea in your regular products:  according to Livestrong, Shea butter is only really healing if used RAW like this product.  Processing it kind of kills the good stuff.  So when you buy a bottle of something that screams Shea butter, how do you know if it is raw?  I looked at a couple of my L'occitane containers and it doesn't say unprocessed or raw.  Hmmm.  I don't know.So I've been using this for a few days and I have to say "SOFT". I've used it on my face, on my lips, around my eyes, on my scabby knee caps, on my rough heels...it is thick and heavy and definitely something you want to put on when you have a little time to be naked and let it absorb, but my skin is already showing improvement.  My snaggle-feet are way smoother and don't gross me out anymore.  If it will help my flip-flop wearing ugly dogs, it has to be doing wonders for my face.  Time will tell.  Anyway, initial reports from the face are no acne and no signs of anything but goodness.Personal tip:  some people microwave this and cocoa butter or heat them on the stove to soften them.  NO!  Leave them raw.  The way I melt this down so I can rub it in without feeling like I am rubbing chalk on myself is with the blow dryer.  I take a tiny piece, about the size of a pea, and rub it in my fingers with the blow dryer aimed at it.  No way am I going to let it overheat because my hand would burn.  It doesn't take much heat to turn it into a liquid oil that rubs right into your skin with ease.  The pea size amount is for my face.  For my legs and body I use about half a golf ball size, maybe a little less.  I heat it the same way.  You can also melt it by rubbing it in your hands, but that takes too long for me.
[+]Can I say WOW!  I am so glad I agreed to review this product. I have contact dermatitis, on my hands, therefore my skin is in rough shape all year round. My hands get extremely dry, cracked, which cause a lot of pain to the point I can not even close my hands. So I have tried every lotion, cream, ointments, even prescription creams. I have gotten relief but never for long. When the mailman handed the package to me and i realized what it was , I couldn't get the bag open quick enough to try this Shea Butter out. When I was asked if I was interested in reviewing this product, I was so excited to see that it was 100% ORGANIC RAW UNREFINED  Shea Butter. I love the feeling, it is not greasy like most creams, and lotions. I don't mind the natural smelling fragrance it has going on. Im not into the fragrant lotions, that can make my skin roar in pain  eek!!! Ive only used this twice now, and my hands look like my hands again. I can say I am hooked.  I will definitely be talking about this product to all my friends. I know they will be happy that I have found a product to help with my skin condition... Because they always hear me complaining either about my pain, or a product that I bought and tried that didn't work lol
[+]My brother got a sample of this product for me as I have stretch marks and sensitive skin. I have used it for a few days now and my skin is definitely better and time will tell if my stretch marks goes away. But I recommend this product to anyone that has sensitive skin or any skin related issues.
[+]This is the first time I have used raw Shea butter...so glad I was offered the opportunity to test it out.  I have used many products that CONTAINED Shea butter but not pure Shea butter. I got a bit of a sunburn on my shoulders while kayaking and was going to put some aloe on it but then I thought this would be a great opportunity to test this butter out. It was so smooth and soothing. I'm going camping in a few weeks and be sure I will bring some Shea along to test on bug bites etc. This bar will last a long long time. So cheap when you compare it to the product that CONTAINS Shea butter. Very good product very fair price.
[+]As a previous customer, I was asked to test this product in exchange for my honest feedback. This product is really intense, but it's great. First, you have to know how to use it. Use it when you have an irritated area, something that's dry or burnt. Also, use it when you're body isn't likely to sweat, because if you're going to sweat your body will have some more trouble absorbing the shea butter. This product really is as organic and natural as it claims. It will test if you really are the true hippie you claim to be. I really enjoy it. I usually use it sparingly, like on certain problem areas, but sometimes I'll use it on my whole body when I want my entire body to feel like a baby's bottom.
[+]LOVE IT!!! AND it works way way better then the conair!
[+]This is one of my favorite fragrances and this brand is the best. Some brands have a &#34;powdery&#34; fragrance-but not Kuumba Made! It lasts all day and will remain hinted on your clothes through multiple wearings. It's very earthy, deep, spicy & sensual. If you&#8217;re looking for something light-you don&#8217;t want this-this is a bold fragrance & this brand is the best I&#8217;ve used so far!
[+]I love this, and all of their brushes!  This brush is extremely soft, and makes my old brushes (including bare minerals brush) feel like sandpaper being brushed across my skin.  I use the flat brush for my liquid foundation, and use this for blush, although it would work for foundation as well. I am able to clean the brush easily, and it doesnt lose any of its bristles.  I own three of them because I love them so much, and hope they continue making them. The only advice I have for this company is keep up the excellent customer service, and make more types of brushes like an eye shadow brush, lip brush, etc.
[+]I have been using Bare Minerals for several years and am always on the lookout for good brushes to use with the product. This long-handled kabuki brush is excellent for use with any mineral make-up. It provides excellent coverage, and it is very soft and easy to use. While many kabuki brushes have short handles, I think the longer handle on this brush makes it easier to use.
[+]Great brush!  This is the softest makeup brush I have ever had.  Blend my mineral make beautifully.
[+]Just received the brush let me tell you that the Kabuki brush is one of he best. makeup goes on smooth and feels really soft to the touch. I used it today and intend to use it everyday for a very long time. The quality is made to last.
[+]I got this kabuki brush for my daughter.  She absolutely loves it.  I have been instructed that I am now allowed to purchase her make-up supplies without first consulting her. lol  She told me that this is the best brush she has ever used for applying powder foundation.  It is incredibly soft and well made.
[+]I love this makeup brush. My new blush brush, fits perfectly in my hand, applies the makeup precisely, so soft! Great price, great quality. I am really impressed. I definitely recommend!!
[+]This is the second kabuki brush I've gotten from Simply Essentials.  I find myself running them across my hands and arms because they feel so GREAT.  It's hard to describe how soft they are.  I've shown them off to my friends and they are all surprised by the feel of them too.  Great product.  I highly recommend them.
[+]I can't say enough about this brush or the brush line as a whole. I am a fan, not only for the price, which you can't beat for a high quality brush, but also for how dense and high quality these are!
[+]Super soft bristles and holds just the right amount of powder for a quick cheekbone highlight or to dust powder all over my face. Works great with not only foundation powder but also bronzer and blush!
[+]I have had other kabuki brushes and absolutely love this one.  i use mineral powder and this brush is so soft and gives a flawless makeup application. The powder goes on lightly and can easily be layered. And the brush is easy to clean - holds its shape and dries quickly. This has become my &#34;go-to&#34; makeup applicator and believe it will stay that way.
[+]This one is easy and efficient to use. Like my husband says: SPA at home which does not break your budget. I used it mostly for detoxing my skin and must admit both me and my skin feel better.
[+]Great Product!!! I have had puffy bags under my eyes for several years; I have tried different creams and expensive treatment with little to no outcome. I purchased this product with low expectations and I was blown away with the results. I noticed results shortly after the 1st use, now this is a part of my daily routine and I could not be happier. I wish I would have known about this fantastic product sooner. Thank You!!!!!!!
[+]The Icy Cool Roller Mini by JoJo is one the most helpful products I use in my home therapy treatments.  I use it for dark or puffy eyes on my clients.  As an Esthetician, I often am bombarded by clients to find new and helpful beauty products.  Icy Cool Roller is unlike anything I have seen before.  The cool relief, applied with minor safe pressure, stimulates the capillaries in the skin, which reduces swelling and blemishes.  Unlike roller balls that women often use, the handle is a perfect fit for hands, which allows for a safe and accurate use.  This roller is so popular with my clients&#8217;, that I have to buy them wholesale so I can sell them to my clients.
[+]I was so happy to find this line here. La Formule products are amazing.
[+]Amazing product.
[+]These are amazing packaging is VERY Similar to the Too Faced melted lipstick (which I also love) only downfall is they are $21.00 each &#128546; but the price of these were amazing!!!! They're regularly $4.95 a pop but all 6 for only $16.93!?!? Very happy with my purchase will be getting another package soon to have for safe keepings....will be back!!!!
[+]Absolety love! I placed my order around eleven at night on a weds and received my order on Friday. It was expected to arrive in a week and a half and I was so shocked. It was package so tight and secure I was so happy with the results. The pigmentation is phenomenal. To buy the set was a better deal than buying them on their site. Plus the earrings were an adorable surprise.
[+]highly pigmented long wearing
[+]I used this serum 3 times so far, using it twice a day and I'm really liking it so far. It's light and silky feeling on my face and neck. A little goes a long way and the dispensing pump is helpful in not pumping more than needed so no waste. My face seems brighter and replenished. I actually think I see a decrease in visibility in fine line around my eyes and mouth. If I'm seeing these results this quickly, I am excited to see what longer term use will produce.
[+]Excellent feel, smooth on skin,non greasy. light scent not overpowering, ok close to eye area. love it
[+]I love this serum. I've only been using it a few days and my skin started looking better from the first use. The serum absorbs quickly and leaves my skin feeling clean and soft. My skin definitely looks smoother and has a healthy glow. I can't wait to see the full results after using it for while. The pump dispenser is nice and I like that I only have to use it once a day.
[+]I am so happy with this product. I have extremely sensitive skin and I am very cautious trying new products. This goes on smoothly and feels great on. I have not had any allergic reaction, which for me, is a great thing. The skins looking great!! Can't wait to see what the future brings for my skin
[+]I've been using this serum for a few days now, and i really like how its making my skin feel so soft. The serum smells light and not overbearing, it absorbs into the skin very quickly. I apply this on my neck and face and its not greasy at all.
[+]I bought this veil for my sister recently,  she loves this beautiful veil so much.
[+]Excellent!
[+]another great set of sugar skulls!  i love these decals (not just the sugar skulls) and have had the best luck with them.  they are just wonderful and Moon Sugar Decals has a huge selection of all different kinds of styles for just about anyone,
[+]I used it first time and really liked it, especially its silky softness. In fact, I used it from head to toe and felt good. Appreciate its lightness and absorbability without leaving greasiness on hair/skin. Being a nature-lover, loved its organic, natural and non-additive ingredient. Don&#8217;t mind paying the small price for health care :)
[+]I am obsessed with these brushes! They are so cute and they work great! I love how it comes in a set... Every brush you will ever need! It shipped fast and the brushes are made well. None of the rhinestones have fallen out and I've been using them daily. Very happy with my purchase!
[+]I love my sparkle rhinestone brush! It shipped quick and it's a good quality brush. Very satisfied with my purchase! I use it everyday and none of the rhinestones have fallen out.
[+]This color show polish is really pretty. It is rose gold colored microglitter suspended in a clear base. It can be used as a topcoat over other colors or it also stands up beautifully on it's own. The color is really quite versatile. I bought this locally at a big box store for $3. Overall it is a beautiful polish and one I will get a lot of use out of.
[+]I am racially mixed, and as such my hair reflects that. I enjoy this product for a few reasons. It hydrates my rather over worked, brittle hair and  in doing so, resorted some of the natural sheen I have had. I really enjoy using it, because it has beautiful scent but it's not soapy or over powering. I am going to continue to use this bottle that I received for free because of promotion and if it keeps restoring my hair luster and sheen- I will pick up another bottle from this seller.
[+]Feels amazing on my skin. Love how easy the pump system is and gets just the right amount on your finger. Easily blends and smells good and works well. My skin feel moisturized and tighter and younger feeling. I really love this product a lot! I don't have any bad things to say about it at all.
[+]Enjoying this product a lot! I've noticed the thin lines disappearing slowly and hope that they'll be completely gone eventually. Definitely makes my skin look better. Great product!
[+]I received this product in exchange for an honest review.  I have been using this product for a few days and have noticed that my skin has been softer and more toned.  It has also helped with my dry skin.  I apply a couple drops to my hands and rub it all the way up to my elbows.
[+]Since I have been using this product I noticed the difference immediately after a few days of use. I use it  3-4 drops at one time and I use it 2 times a day, in the morning and at night.  My skin appears clearer, more toned and definitely more youthful.  The serum is  light-weight and penetrates quickly. I use it on my neck as well. After it absorbs into my skin, I apply my daily moisturizer over it. My friends are asking what I use on my skin because I'm 44 and people think I'm in my 20s.  I tell them good genes - definitely and wonderful products like this.  I  definitely recommend this product to others.
[+]This is a nice product that smells good and leaves your skin feeling soft and refreshed. I would recommend it to someone looking for an inexpensive way to improve their overall skin.I do at times get free product/discounts in exchange for reviewing a product. However, this does not alter my opinion of the review and I do not get paid for this.
[+]Feels great. I already notice a difference after a few days. With such a great response already, I'm sure it continue to be amazing with continued use. I highly recommend this product.
[+]I love this serum! I have very sensitive skin, so I am wary of many products- but this makes my skin feel soft and smooth instead of making it dry and flaky! It is like kombucha for your skin- it revitalizes and you can feel your skin glowing!
[+]I have only used this product for 4 days so far, and already I can see and feel a difference in the texture of my skin.
[+]The first time I heard about retinol was when I asked an older woman with beautiful skin what her secret was and she said retinol. I thought it was going to be something like be happy! Or something like that, but with an answer as specific and attainable as that, I had to check it out. I purchased some from Absorb Health because I like the fact that they focus on natural ingredients. Well, I try it and I already noticed a big difference on my skin.
[+]I was so LUCKY to have been given a Free sample of the Coco Amo Love Coconut Oil Leave Hair Conditioner.It was part of very generous and nice Public promotion.As I was walking out of the train station I was offered a sample and I was so very glad that I took it.My hair has immeasurably benefited from this Magnificent product by; DM2Solutions. Fantastic. It smoothes, hydrates, and rejuvenates your dry and frizzy hair and my hair has all those attributes.It is a conditioner designed especially for black or thicker hair. Now my friends use it as well.It gives a soft, dextrous and luxurious feeling to your hair with a pleasant and rich coconut scent.Superlative product. I highly recommend it. I am so lucky to have been given the sample during the promotion.
[+]Just want to start off, this product has literally given me the confidence I've been looking for. I've had a long history when it comes to trying to find good, affordable and reliable hair products for my dry and nappy hair. I would usually use conditioners after I've dried my hair after a shower and rarely while I was in. Every time, though, when I walked outside, my hair would quickly go from soft and manageable to dry, nappy, and unkempt. I later tried, this conditioner that claimed would relax and hydrate my hair, but left it more greasy then what I really wanted. I unfortunately kept using this greasy conditioner, as it worked, but only sort of. While at work, on the other hand, my friends or fellow employee's would constantly or pass by comment on how greasy or oily it looked. One person even said my hair looked as if it was spray painted on because of how shiny it looked. Naturally, this made me feel down and I would even decline to go to social events just because of how &#34;fake&#34; my hair looked. Anyway, a friend of mine who found out about Coco Amo, showed me how the product worked on her hair and I decided to try out...absolutely amazing..There really is nothing like this out on the market, it literally changed my being and restored my hair. My hair is silky, I can pass my fingers through it with ease...it's like I have new healthy, naturally soft hair. I can't even believe it sometimes, my reaction when I touch my hair; my fingers just pass through myhair with no resistance. I sometimes can't speak sometimes, I'm just so amazed. So ladies, if you're looking for a product that'll never let you down..PLEASE look into Coco Amo's LOVE conditioner, I believe in LOVE and you will too!
[+]Can't get enough of this product. Even use this on my body.  Wish it came in a larger bottle. Looks so natural!
[+]This is my second purchase of this item, It's an easy choice when a company has all their products rated EWG 0. It would be great in a travel size so I could fly with it!
[+]This serum really works! I am 43 years old and I have only been using this serum for a few weeks but I have already noticed a difference in my skin. My skin feels so smooth and appears much more firm. I would definitely recommend this product!
[+]I usually never write reviews on beauty products because I'm always disappointed. However, this product is different and really works. I'm in my early 30s and have been using the product for about a month now. Within about a week, I noticed my skin looked plumper. In more recent weeks I've noticed my pores are visibly smaller and my skin is significantly smoother. This was particularly noticeable with the skin underneath my eyes. I've suffered from dark under eye circles since I was a teenager and have tried several products for years now to help reduce their appearance, but have failed to see any improvement until I started using this serum. This product has also helped to reduce hyper-pigmentation I've incurred from acne.
[+]Amazing results!  I have tried several products that claim to smooth wrinkles, firm skin, lighten dark spots, ect., but none of them really worked.  My skin keeps looking better and better every day since I have been using this serum.  I put it on morning and night and follow up with a moisturizer.  It absorbs quickly into my skin, making it easy to apply makeup right away.  My skin feels firmer and my age spots are fading away!  I am in love! JP
[+]Very nice clay mask that's in a powder form and gets mixed with water giving it as thick or as thin a consistency as you personally like.  I've used it twice and I like the results I've gotten so far.  It made my skin feel softer and smoother.  I'm looking forward to tightening my skin pores with continued use of it. Yes, I recommend it!!!
[+]Great stuff! Left my skin super smooth and clean, without the dry feeling to get sometimes with masks.
[+]Amazing Clay! love how it made my skin feel. I wish I knew about this stuff before waisting so much money on other products and skin procedures. I am looking forward to continuing using this product and see how much smaller my pores will get from the mask.
[+]I had a few bouts with bad facial oils that either left my skin very oily, or just bothered me.I love that this is an organic oil, and it feels great.Much to my delight, it also doesnt look as if I am wearing any oil on my face, it just looks smooth.I recommend this to all who have been looking for a great facial oil!'
[+]Being in a tropical country has it's ups and downs. One of them being that my skin is always exposed under the scorching hot sun making it rough and oily. I use this product every time after i take a bath and it has done wonders. It restores the vibrant color of my skin and rejuvenates it.I love the scent of it too. I highly recommend using this product to others who has similar problems with mine. It a product that you will spent you money on well.
[+]Love this Rosehip Oil. Lately my mother has been very self-conscious about her skin, and asked me to get her Rosehip Oil. I wasn't sure what this was, so I spent some time looking at different brands, and found Dr.Song. This had the most positive reviews that described the oil. My mom's skin is looking a really healthy and smooth now that she uses it everyday and it even made her happier about her skin. Works great and would recommend it to anyone.
[+]Smooth Non greasy oil, as long as you don't apply too much and you don't need to. Just a few dabs and you apply it to your skin and you can immediately feel the effects on your skin. Your skin feels much smoother and there is no sheen left over you skin which is perfect. Great product.
[+]This is a great moisturizer.  Just use a few drops and my skin becomes hydrated, also nice to mix with a base moisturizer.  Best part is, its a dry oil, so your face doesn't end up greasy.
[+]I am very happy with my purchase.The oil is of very high quality and was packaged in a anti-UV light glass bottle. I am considering stocking this item in my skincare stores.
[+]Alot of product that has rosehip oil is costly but not from Dr. Song. It pretty cheap and the best thing is the product works on your skin. When you apply this oil on your skin it make the skin much younger and the skintone better. Just a few drops and its all good. I use it everyday before i go to sleep and when i wake up. My skins all lighten up and soften too. I love this product. I would highly recommend to buy it
[+]I use a few drop in the bath and also on my pillow at night and this makes me sleep so well.My grandmother always used to use it and now I can pass this on to my children as this is one of the best kept secrets of all time.Item was shipped really quickly and was well packaged
[+]I've been using different Rosehip Oils in the market due to dry skin problem, and so far, the Dr Song's Rosehip Oil was the most effective. My skin was revived again, the oil was quickly absorbed but the effect was long lasting. Another plus for the fact that I don't feel any greasy feeling and there's no itchiness which is the main reason why I switched from another Rosehip Oil product to another one. The price was cheaper too, I really recommended using this item.
[+]My wife have been using this Rosehip oil about a month and Shes very please with the product. She was using another oil that She could no longer find and was hesitate to switch to another brand. She asked me to find similar to that product. After that I found out Dr Song's Rosehip Oil 4oz. I'm glad that I found a product that's even effective than previous one. My wife liked this Resoehip oil very much. The oil makes her skin soft and younger looking without the harsh chemicals and she was happy using it, because the oil is organic. Now shes encouraging me to try it. Overall very effective product than other Rosehip oil are on the market right now.
[+]This oil has softened both my fine lines and skin.  I also love that it comes in a glass bottle and a dropper to control how much oil.
[+]I've used this product and it works well.  My skin feels clean and tighter.
[+]I purchased this for my wife and she loves it so much! I know now what to get here on holidays and her Birthday. I love what it does for her face. Great product. Great seller too!
[+]After the first mask, my skin was softer and my pores were smaller. My boyfriend who has no skin condition said that his skin was really soft  and feeling great
[+]There are many rosehip oils out there, some of them are more costly and some of them are cheaper, but Dr Song is good value for money. There has been a huge revival in the use of oils on the face, as opposed to creams, and there is a lot of evidence to back up its effectiveness. Oils are absorbed by the skin very well and many have a natural affinity. I have always used them at night, ever since I was in my teens and whilst they haven't turned me into Angelina Jolie, my skin is much younger than it's age.
[+]The product is pretty cheap and no doubt at it because this product perfectly works on my skin! :)I recommend this product for others. I got my product yesterday and been using it till now with no issues at all.
[+]I would definitely recommend this product to any friend.  The oil thickness is perfect and natural.  The Roseship works great on my skin, especially my face.  It is easy to apply and really feels that it is making your skin look better.  The quality does not match the price; it exceeds it.
[+]Great Product, I use it every time I need it! Will recommend to anyone who needs it!
[+]I was flattered when I got my first complement. Someone told me that I looked younger, and I felt so warm inside. I started to feel like a kid again. This oil really helps, and isn't expensive at all. The price is very nice, and the quality of the oil is superb. It gets the job done, and it does it quite well. The oil is really smooth and it doesn't make my skin look &#34;oily&#34;, hopefully you know what I mean. I will definitely be buying again!
[+]I love to mix this rosehip oil with my other essential oils as a booster and it keeps my skin soft as a baby's bottomreview title: softer skin
[+]Got this like a week ago, I've been using it on my skin especially my hands, which are starting to develop age spots. It has definitely faded them, and I'm pretty happy about that. this product is really easy to use packaging is fantastic and the bottle is a generous supply that will last and last. People have been using Rosehip oil for a long time back when other products but Dr. Song Rosehip Oil is the best. Will recommend this to friends and coworkers alike.
[+]I purchased this rosehip oil for my mother's birthday, because her doctor recommended an oil for daily usage like this. I though this one will be a good choice. My mother tried this out, and we surprised about the result. My mother tried out lot of liquids supplements, and creams, but those did not cause any good result. But this oil is a way better than the others. She love to use it, and asked me to buy an other one!Excellent product, I can recommend to everyone!
[+]I was apprehensive at first to buy this oil since I was worried it would give my face that greasy look, but tried it anyways because its supposed to be a &#34;dry oil&#34;.  Well, to my surprise, it is fairly dry, as long as you don't use too much, and doesn't really leave that greasy look. Overall, a good oil.
[+]Rosehip oil has great moituzuring and healing properties. This oil absorbs quickly and makes my skin feel much softer.
[+]First I started using this oil on my face, but now I use it on everything.  I use all over my body, and even started using it in my hair, and it has improved everything.
[+]After hearing from a friend about various advantages of  Rosehip Oil, I bought this product on his recommendation. I used it for a while on my skin , I loved it so far. By looking at the colour I can say its pure and organic. It made my skin look smooth, I used it twice a day. It hydrates the skin and moisturizes it. Since I have an oily skin  it works better than any moisturizer available in the market .I would recommend this product to every one looking for a pure oil for their skin. Unlike other oils of this kind, the odour seems to be pleasant.Apart from my skin I also use the oil for my nails. It did wonders when I applied it to a scar that is bothering me from past three weeks. The scar is noticable , But when I applied the oil for three days it just made the scar invisible. I love the product and would buy few more as it makes me look young and fresh.
[+]As my skin ages I find that it lacks luster.  Moisturizers do not seem to work as they once did.  This product addresses both of these issues.  First, it seems to get rid of all that is causing the lack of luster, namely dead cells.  In doing so, I think it is preparing the skin to accept the moisturizers and actually makes them more effective.  I love it!  I thought I have sensitive skin, but I can use it a few times a week without any problems. Great for those dark spots also making them less apparent.
[+]Received everything intact!! Delivery was really fast!! Really good quality for a great price!! Really recommend buying this for any nail work, I am starting In the nail world and this set has make it for me!! Plus you get a free e book!!
[+]I've always been a nail biter, but after a recent infection in one of my fingers I realized it was time to stop for good. My nails have been growing out for about two months now and they're starting to look good, but I'm concerned about biting them again. A friend suggested I start painting them, but I'm not really a fan of doing that, so they bought me this nail art kit and did my nails for the first time.I love it! Love love love it. The kit came in a cute little roll-up pouch and has everything I could possibly need to make my nails look super awesome. There are brushes, dotting tools and a super handy instruction book that told me everything to get started and do this on my own. I'm a believer now, for sure. SO thankful this little kit came into my life - I can't imagine ever biting my nails again!
[+]smell good , a little alcohol in it ,feels fresh after use it .
[+]This left my face feeling very fresh and smooth. I would recommend it.
[+]I did a mask the other night and it was great. Felt clean and smooth. Very nice result and all natural!
[+]Loved the mask. The container is really cute too. Thanks!
[+]This product made more of a difference than I thought it would.  I can see why Cleopatra used it!  :) The mud works at cleansing at a deep level.  My face felt great afterwards.  I can't wait to see how it will look after using for even just a month.  I agree with everyone else.  You should give it a try!
[+]Wow!  When I had the mask on my face was tingling.  When I washed it off 15 mins later my pores were way reduced, my skin was soft and had a glow about it.  Thank you.
[+]If you want a natural facial cleansing mask that deep cleans your pores, this is the one. Easy to apply and you can actually feel it tightening your skin.
[+]I used this this morning.  I am someone who uses many skin care products.  I do  TCA and Lactic Acid peels regularly.  I was surprised at the effectiveness of this product.  After 1 mask for 20 minutes, my skin was tighter, less lines, and i was really surprised at the how the color and tone of my skin was even.  Most redness was gone.  The problem with most peels is your skin is inflamed and red for days after the peel.  This mask is very good, not very harsh, and you see results right away.  I plan to use it regularly.
[+]The mask is absolutely amazing! I noticed a difference right away. My face felt tighter, even my wrinkles minimized so much! Needless to say I felt younger and was excitingly walking around my house waiting on my husband to get home...and guess what! He kept saying I was glowing and so beautiful and w
[+]Seems like nice clay, skin feels smooth after using it.
[+]This is a fantastic product. It arrived to my house yesterday and I used it last night. Wow....the sensation I got as I literally felt the clay pull the impurities out of my skin was incredible. Years ago I was paralyzed in the face, and am mostly healed now but still have slight paralysis and numbness...so I am always searching for new, completely natural products to put on my face. After using this mask, I swear I even felt like my muscles moved better. I highly recommend it! M.S.
[+]I tried this on my exema that I have on my back...wow! It cleared right up! Also it's asuEr &#34;all-purpose&#34; face mask. Goes on smoothly with a nice consistency.
[+]WOW! my skin feels amazing and my pores are visibly smaller. As the mask sat on my face I felt my skin being cleansed and detoxicated. I wish I could apply this all over my body. I've used many different kind of clay mask and this is by far one of the best ones I've tried. I will definitely order more once I am done using it up.
[+]Love how the clay stiffens and really pulls out the stuff in my face!
[+]I have used quite a few high end facial products and masks and there are some pretty good one's out there. I received this and tried it once so far and do like it lot. I used such a small amount you could tell I used any from the jar and mixed it with water and left it on for only 20 minutes. When I rinsed it off my very dry, chappy skin was smooth and looked clear and bright with better coloring. I was surprised. My face looked great all day and after the next shower still felt much better. I'll keep using it and don't see a need for other products for my face at all. I especially like that it's all organic ingredients because that is important to me. Thanks for caring about that!
[+]I really like this stuff.  It is very light weight, goes on nice and clean.  I have only used if for about a week and noticed that the fine lines are diminishing and my skin feels tighter.  I will continue to use this product.
[+]Nice texture and lightweight feeling
[+]Awesome stuff!  My skin looks amazing after only using for 7 days!  Definitely recommend to everyone!
[+]I just started using this product  and love it so far!!
[+]I have only been using it for a few days now but it seems to be working amazingly.
[+]Wow!  This anti-aging serum is a must. The bottle arrived and it is smaller than I thought it would be, but you only use a few drops so you see why.  It smells great and is so easy to apply. It makes your face tighten a little and you feel fresh.  I was overly surprised!
[+]This stuff is so bizarre.  I got it as a sample, which is great, because I never would have cold-purchased something like this.  I put it on my face, and almost immediately got this odd, chunky, white stuff all over.  Strange- but it works!!  My skin is so smooth and soft, and the dry skin I have been unable to get rid of by exfoliating (among other things) was instantly gone.  A bit expensive, but I will definitely be buying this.  Great marketing move by sending out samples.  Well done.
[+]I love this product.  I have extremely sensitive, combination pale skin.  Even facial cleansers make my skin burn.  This product is amazing.  It really only takes 3 minutes.  It's kinda creepy because you actually feel the skin sloughing off and balling up under your fingers.  The only (minor) complaint I have is if you let this dry on your face for longer than a few minutes without massaging it like the instructions say, it dries on your skin and is kinda difficult to get off.  I had a small patch dry under my jawline and I had to seriously scrub at it and pick at it to get it off.  But if you follow the instructions, this is a miracle product.  Your skin will feel like silk.  Amazing.
[+]I love these nails and I use them a lot but if you buy them go to CVS or RiteAid because they are much cheaper.  The only problem is that they slightly chip at the ends (barely noticeable)
[+]I have owned many professional hair dryers and this is by far the best hair dryer i have owned. I still can not believe how light it is, every time i pick it up it amazes me. It is also super quiet. Was worth every penny and I Highly recommended for anyone who wants a true professional hair dryer.
[+]Love this mud! It makes your face smooth and soft! It has really helped with my acne and dry patches.
[+]I'm vegan and where can you find vegan products that actually work and are a decent price?!? My skin feels absolutely amazing! I was a fan of glam glow and I won't touch it now that I have found Hemp 360. My crazy dry to oily skin just feels even, supple and clean. I purchased the kit at the New Braunfels Farmer's Market and I recommend getting the full kit so you can try everything together. We also purchased the raw for the neighbor girl's eczema with great success. So proud we share the same hometown with such an amazing product that really works!
[+]I have dry skin by nature so most mud masks leave my face so dry and tight it hurts. This mask leaves my skin feeling great, as do all of the Hemp360 products. Best line of skin care products ever!
[+]Absolutely LOVE this product.  The best face mask I have ever used!  I also recently started using this on my feet & heels, and they have been so smooth.  Your skin feels amazing after using this.  I use this along with the Facial Cleanser Bar, and will never use anything else!
[+]I am always on the lookout for excellent skincare products and I have spent years and lots of money trying every product under the sun. Two weeks ago I ran across the Hemp360 booth at the Blanco Lavender festival.  There was a myriad of booths selling lavender soaps and other handmade products but the thing that impressed me the most about the folks at this booth was they had an answer for every question about their product. There are no artificial ingredients or weird preservatives in their products and everything was around $25-$30, which is way less than I have paid for products like this in the past.I purchased the face kit, which included their face soap bar and trial sized containers of their moisturizer, skin repair raw lotion & the Himalayan hemp mud and I started using it all that night.  I have an acne scar on my cheek that I have been trying to get rid of for months now so I used the skin repair lotion and then used the Himalayan Hemp Mud as a spot treatment right before bed.  The next morning I noticed that the scar was lighter which blew my mind that I would see a visible improvement overnight!  After using the products for 2 weeks now my skin looks & feels healthier and I have even noticed that the fine lines & wrinkles on my face are becoming less noticeable.I have been raving about these products to all of my friends so I couldn't help but post a great review here.  I would most definitely recommend this product to anyone, hands down.
[+]I have been using this product for a month now, and can tell a significant difference in my skin! It is such an amazing product! Would recommend to anyone!
[+]I love this stuff! I slather it on and pretend to be a monster and tickle my son. AndAfter I wash off the mud my skin feels so soft and clean. I love mud! Who knew?!
[+]Hemp360's Himalayan Hemp Mud is a dream come true! After a long day nothing beats soaking in a bubbly bath slathered with Hemp Mud all over my face, neck, arms, hands, and feet.  I emerge softer than a baby's hiney.  Vegan, organic ingredients = LOVE!
[+]Wonderful product and company! Being a vegan, it's hard to find products and they have several. This mud made my face very soft, helped my acne and scares my Kids every time! It's a win Win! I Love how pure and natural every one of their products is.
[+]This is the best hot pink gel polish I've ever tried. The gel lasted over three+ weeks. I highly recommend.
[+]Love this product!  In just a few days this has smoothed the wrinkles around my eyes.  It also made my skin feel tighter and look smoother.  I recommend this product to anyone who wants to look and feel younger.
[+]Nice packaging. A little goes a long way. Smells clean.
[+]I can already see a difference on my face. Definitely going to continue to buy this product
[+]Tones and firms.  A little bit goes a long way
[+]Very nice product.  Lightweight and a little goes a long way!
[+]Very lightweight feeling a little goes a long way!! Smells great and makes skin feel great!!
[+]Love the smell, made my skin feel so soft and smooth.
[+]This has been a really great product! It's added so much moisture to my face and neck. No more drying out in the middle of the day! I am extremely pleased!
[+]very happy with this product am glad I tried it. will purchase again
[+]I recently received this product last week and I love it. My heels are a little rough even after coming from getting a pedicure. So when I received this I've been using it in the morning and night after getting out of the shower n I must say I see a big difference. My feet are a lot softer and smoother. I can see using this for a month my feet would be smooth as a baby's bottom. I also love that it's not heavy and greasy. Thank you so much.
[+]I used a sample of adwi for two weeks and I fell in love this product is awesome my skin feels amazing and my face no longer feels dry I would recommend this product to anyone that suffers from cracked dry skin and u can also use it as a body massage cream
[+]This is the best Shea butter I've used.  I have been experimenting with Shea butter for several years now and I just could find one that went on smooth and provided results.  I happy to say I have found my Shea butter love&#128537;
[+]I love this Shea Butter!!!!!!  It is great for many reasons concerning the skin.  I like that it is all-natural-- raw and unrefined.... compared to other brands I've used in the past.  Not only did they have chemicals that I'd never heard of, but I didn't feel like they worked as well.  If you're into organic and natural products, I'd recommend this to you!!!!  I've heard some friends say it works well for eczema as well.
[+]Great shea butter overall thick with great sealing properties especially for skin and hair
[+]I have a burn mark on my finger that is real dry and peels. I have Tried so many different medicated ointments and creams and nothing seemed to work. I tried ADWI Shea Butter and I feel I finally found a cure for my burn.
[+]Evening primrose oil has long been a staple skin care ingredient especially for mature skinThis great oil contains this well known plant extract so you know what you are usingSoothes irritated and sore skin and common skin conditionsHighly recommended
[+]cant wate to buy this for my wedding when i get my money on 9/1 I WISH YOU ALL HAD FREE SAMPLES THAT WOULD BE GREAT
[+]I have fallen in love with this moisturizer and wrinkle reducer. It sinks into your skin immediately and just disappears. You feel an immediate soothing relief. Spots on my skin are disappearing! Try it and you will feel and see the difference. No harsh stinging or irritation like some other products. I have read up on nerium, and it has some very promising results for correcting major sun damage. I have used many expensive treatments (Life Cell, Murad, Obagi) and I am sticking with PANDEIA!
[+]I started using the Pandeia about 5 weeks ago on my face and my upper back and I'm so happy to write about how wonderful it is.  My doctor had prescribed steroid cream for a persistent rash on my upper back and I tried the Pandeia Skin lotion instead.  Within 2-3 weeks, the rash was completely gone.  There was an age spot on my face just above my lip, and that also disappeared within a couple of weeks.  My skin looks smoother and more radiant.  There's no added fragrance but it's still pleasant.  It's better than much more expensive, commercially packaged creams I've tried.
[+]I used this product when I got home from vacationing in Florida. I was still burnt and beginning to peel on my face. After one use of the seaweed powder aloe face mask my skin felt and looked so much better!! (I could honesty see/feel a difference). I defiantly recommended this product!! I can't wait to use it more and try different seaweed powder recipes!! LOVE IT
[+]I love this product! It the most versatile beauty product I have ever used&#8230; and the price is GREAT!!! I went to the lalunenaturals website to get the face mask recipe, but I was so surprise of all of the different mask, scrub, and wrap recipes that you can make with the seaweed powder. I did a basic seaweed mask and my skin feels softer. I cannot wait to try a wrap next!
[+]Love the product!  Shipping was extremely fast; actually surprised me, and their customer service is top notch!  I'm using it for my daughter's eczema and can already see her outbreaks calming down.  I highly recommend LaLune Naturals' seaweed powder.  Looking forward to experimenting with other recipes for myself.
[+]I used this product for my infant who suffers from excema. I tried numerous products such as aveeno, cetaphyl and aquafor, and none of them compare to adwiorganics shea butter. It has helped her skin tremendously. This product leaves her skin feeling smooth and moist, not greasy and heavy like with other products. It's even gentle enough to use on her face. I've finally found a product that I trust on my babies delicate sensitive skin. Thanks adwiorganics!!!!!!
[+]I absolutely love this Shea Butter it's amazing! Since starting the fast of Ramadan my lips have been really dry and most balms just coat the lip. ADWI Shea butter actually penetrates and leaves them feeling hydrated. Works really well for replenishing super dry skin. It also spreads on nice and smooth and for those who are familiar with Shea butters, sometimes they're really hard and require a lot of massaging to make them manageable, so that's definitely another plus. &#128077;
[+]I found this particular brand of Shea Butter to be worth the money. If your looking for something that's gonna leave your skin moisturized without feeling like your putting an extra coat of oil on your skin then this will do just that! It goes on nice and smooth. A little goes a long way and its not heavy which is a plus. The only thing is every time I used it, I've used it on my hair with other hair products so I can't speak on  how it acts in my hair alone. Although for skin care its wonderfulllllll. It leaves your skin very hydrated and moisturized for a very long time. Overall I am pleased with keeping it as one of my staple products.
[+]I'm in love with this product! It is the best Shea butter that I've used this far. It is thick yet easily absorbed into the skin. I've been using it only for a few days on a few dry patches and by day 3 I've noticed a huge difference. I also been rubbing the excess on my lips and my lips are super soft. I will defintely continue using this!
[+]As a result of working out I constantly suffer from dry and crack feet. I tried using conventional lotions and oils but was not satisfied. After using this Shea butter for about a week I could see and feel the difference in my feet.
[+]I like this shea butter it is the best,  awesome...no more using vaseline  ever !!!
[+]I love this prodcut . Highly recommend it.  I put the lotion all over body and and night the thicker cream in the large tub around eyes and on hands. It is smooth, soaks in quickly, it's not greasy.  It is making my skin younger.  !  Recommended by my dermatologist.
[+]THE ceraRVE PRODUCTS ARE ALL GOOD THAT IS WHY I BOUGHT THEM ALL LOVE THEM WHAT MORE CAN I SAY
[+]I never write reviews but after getting a sample of this from my derm I was convinced. I had been recently trying some better brand lotions and I thought Eucerin was a top choice. However, this is the absolute best hands down. I use it all over and nothing makes my skin feel so good. I won't ever use anything else.
[+]My dermatologist recommend CeraVe.  She said it's better for dry skin than a lot of the prescription lotions she has samples of.  I have to agree, it's that good.  The winters here in the northwest can be very dry.  This lotion takes care of my dry hands and face for almost 24 hours, which is great for me.
[+]lots of moisture, helps baby eczema
[+]CeraVe has a reputation for great skin products. I have been using the moisturizing cleanser and decided to use the cream as my night time moisturizer.This is a real find for me. It is light on my skin, feels smooth on my face and after three days if use, my skin feels and looks smoother. I am using an expensive cream now and have for several years.  I have dry skin in the winter, and now my skin feels very smooth. I am using this as a body moisturizer, also. The price is quite attractive for the amount of moisturizer. The lotion is smooth without any grease. Once it is applied, the cream is absorbed, and skin is smooth.Could not ask for a better product.Recommended. prisrob 05-13-14
[+]This lotion was highly touted on one of morning show beauty segments, so I had to try it. As a semi-compulsive hand washer, I'm always on the lookout for a lotion that can sit proudly next to the hand soap.Ok, maybe not compulsive, it's just that I love to cook and wash a zillion times when preparing anything. I was telling a friend that I had seen this product on TV, and she said she was already using it and loves it. She raved about how it is supposed to last throughout the day to heal your dry skin, and she was using it as a body lotion.I'm IN! Grab that Amazon Gift Card and GO!In a word.....meh.It's a nice lotion, but at least for me, nothing special. However, if they say it on TV it HAS to be TRUE, right? I think I'll give the CeraVe cream a try. Maybe the lotion formula isn't intense enough for my ragged digits.
[+]I have oily skin and adult acne, and my dermatologist recommended this for my face when I need a moisturizer (so unfair to have to worry about wrinkles and acne at the same time!)  I love it and now use it for hands and body as well.  It's light and soaks right in and makes skin feel soft and comfortable, not slick.  Nothing else works quite as well.  I wish it were easier to find, drugstore no longer seems to carry it.
[-]I m not impressed by this usb bcoz this device is not supporting my lenovo 6000+
